Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 4. AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE

CHAPTER 11. COTTON

Art. 165-4. COTTON RESEARCH AWARD FUND.

Sec. 1. By this Act it is expressly declared to be a State policy that the encouragement and stimulation of new uses for cotton shall be a matter of State-wide importance and concern and that the various agencies of the State Government, and more particularly the various State agricultural departments, agencies, schools, colleges, etc., are hereby directed to take full and sufficient notice and consideration of the policy herein established and set forth, and the activities of all agencies of the State Government, and more particularly those especially mentioned above are hereby directed to be revamped and reorganized so as to conform with the provisions of this Act.

Sec. 2. The Governor of this State is hereby directed as the Chief Executive and Administrative Officer of this State to use his efforts to carry out the policy set forth above.

Sec. 3. In order to assist in carrying out the policy set forth in this Act, there is hereby created the "Cotton Research Award Fund", and there is hereby appropriated to this fund out of any money in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated the sum of Ten Thousand ($10,000.00) Dollars. The President of the University of Texas, the President of the A. & M. College, and the President of Texas Technological College are hereby designated as a Board of Trustees of said fund. Said Board of Trustees are hereby appointed and empowered to dispense said fund in keeping with rules and regulations which a majority of said Board may adopt, provided that the same are not in conflict with the provisions of this Act. Said rules and regulations shall be drawn up and published within ninety days from the effective date of this Act, and among other things, they shall provide for:

(a) An award of not less than Five Thousand ($5,000.00) Dollars, nor more than Ten Thousand ($10,000.00) Dollars to any resident Texas citizen, who, by chemical research or other invention or device, discovers any process or method which hereafter brings about an increase in the consumption of cotton annually in an amount equal to or greater than three hundred thousand (300,000) bales of five hundred (500) pounds net weight;

(b) The persons mentioned above are to be the sole judges as to whether the required increase in consumption of cotton above mentioned has actually taken place, and the Comptroller of Public Accounts is hereby authorized to pay warrants drawn on the "Cotton Research Award Fund" when said warrants are signed by a majority of the three persons above mentioned.

Acts 1939, 46th Leg., p. 1.